Wisconsin, session 2025, AB725.
do enact as follows:AB725,11Section 1. 301.39 of the statutes is created to read:AB725,2,102301.39 Notification of restriction affecting visiting periods or other 3communication. (1) The department shall establish and maintain a notification 4system that allows an individual designated by an inmate of a state correctional 5institution to elect to be automatically notified via email, text message, or other 6electronic message within 24 hours of that inmate being placed under any type of 7individual or group restriction that affects availability for visiting periods or 8communication. An inmate may designate up to 3 individuals to be notified under 9this subsection, and notifications may be terminated by the individual or inmate 10only. The department may not terminate notifications under this subsection.AB725,3,311(2) The sheriff shall establish and maintain a notification system that allows 12an individual designated by an inmate of a county jail to elect to be automatically 13notified via email, text message, or other electronic message within 24 hours of that 14inmate being placed under any type of individual or group restriction that affects 15availability for visiting periods or communication. An inmate may designate up to 13 individuals to be notified under this subsection, and notifications may be 2terminated by the individual or inmate only. The sheriff may not terminate 3notifications under this subsection.AB725,24Section 2. 301.40 of the statutes is created to read:AB725,3,85301.40 Restricted movement reporting system. (1) The department 6shall establish and maintain on the department’s website an interactive reporting 7system that is updated no less frequently than every 48 hours that reports all of the 8following information for each state correctional institution and county jail:AB725,3,139(a) Whether any type of restriction upon an inmate or group of inmates that 10affects availability for visiting periods or communication is in effect at that state 11correctional institution or county jail, and if a restriction is in effect, a statement 12identifying the reason that the restriction is in effect and how long the restriction 13has been in effect.AB725,3,1614(b) The number of inmates who are currently being held in solitary 15confinement at that state correctional institution or county jail and disaggregated 16data identifying the reasons for placement in solitary confinement.AB725,3,1817(c) The total number of inmates who are currently being held at that state 18correctional institution or county jail.AB725,3,2219(2) (a) The sheriff shall supply the department with the information 20described in sub. (1) about the county jail in the format specified by the department 21in par. (b). The information shall be submitted weekly and shall be current as of the 22time the information is submitted.AB725,4,623(b) The department shall furnish sheriffs with instructions that specify the 1information that is required to be reported under sub. (1), a simple format in which 2to submit the information, the time it is to be forwarded, the process for submitting 3the information, the method of classifying it, and any other matters that facilitate 4collection and compilation. The format provided under this paragraph shall, to the 5greatest extent feasible, minimize the time required by each sheriff to submit the 6required information.AB725,37Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.AB725,4,108(1) The reporting system required under s. 301.40 (1) shall be operable by no 9later than the first day of the 7th month beginning after the effective date of this 10subsection.AB725,4,1411(2) Until the reporting system required under s. 301.40 (1) is active on the 12department of corrections’ website, the department of corrections shall submit to 13the chief clerk of each house of the legislature, for distribution to the appropriate 14standing committees under s. 13.172 (3), the following reports:AB725,4,1615(a) Twice per week, a report of any type of restriction upon an inmate or group 16of inmates that are currently in effect.AB725,4,1817(b) Once every 3 months, a report on the total number of individuals who have 18been placed in solitary confinement during that 3-month period.AB725,419Section 4. Fiscal changes.AB725,5,420(1) Notification system for restrictions affecting visiting periods or 21other communication. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to 22the department of corrections under s. 20.410 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal 23year 2025-26 is increased by $780,000 to establish and operate the notification 1system under s. 301.39 (1). In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation 2to the department of corrections under s. 20.410 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal 3year 2026-27 is increased by $275,000 to operate the notification system under s. 4301.39 (1).AB725,5,105(2) Limited term office operations associates. In the schedule under s. 620.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of corrections under s. 20.410 (1) 7(a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $94,200 to increase the 8authorized LTE positions for the department of corrections by 2.0 office operations 9associate positions to be employed until the systems under ss. 301.39 and 301.40 10are operational.AB725,5,1111